Tennessee, session 114, SB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-502(a), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(8) A child care agency, as defined in § 71-3-501, licensed by the department of
human services.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1169
002251
- 1 -